Hawaii statutes.
[§141-37]
Inspections; fees. (a) All licensees are subject to sampling of their
industrial hemp crop to verify that the delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol
concentration does not exceed 0.3 per cent on a dry weight basis or a
tetrahydrocannabinol concentration allowed by federal law, whichever is greater.

(b) During the inspection, the licensee or the
licensee's authorized representative shall be present at the growing area. The
licensee or authorized representative shall provide the board's inspector with complete
and unrestricted access to all industrial hemp plants and seeds whether growing
or harvested; all land, buildings, and other structures used for the
cultivation and storage of industrial hemp; and all documents and records
pertaining to the licensee's industrial hemp business.

(c) Sampling of industrial hemp plants shall
occur in the following manner:

(1) Samples of each variety of industrial hemp may be
sampled from the growing areas at the board's discretion;

(2) Quantitative laboratory determination of the
delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration on a dry weight basis shall be
performed according to protocols approved by the chairperson;

(3) A sample test result greater than 0.3 per cent of
delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration or a tetrahydrocannabinol
concentration allowed by federal law, whichever is greater, shall be considered
conclusive evidence that at least one cannabis plant or part of a plant in the
growing area contains a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration over the limit
allowed for industrial hemp and that the licensee of that growing area is
therefore not in compliance with this part. Upon receipt of such a test
result, the chairperson may summarily suspend and revoke the license of an
industrial hemp licensee. The chairperson shall furnish to the licensee a
portion of the violative sample if the licensee requests it within thirty days
of notification; and

(4) Test results from an institution of higher
education may, at the chairperson's discretion, be accepted in lieu of board
sampling.

(d) Licensees shall pay a charge of $35 per
hour per inspector for actual drive time, mileage, inspection, and sampling
time.

(e) Licensees shall reimburse the board for
all laboratory analysis costs incurred. [L 2016, c 228, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next